Louisiana, session 2026, HB585.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Part III of Chapter 3 of Title 23 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950,
comprised of R.S. 23:271 through 276, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
PART III. DISCOUNT RETAILER WORKFORCE SAFETY AND RETENTION ACT
§271. Short title
This Part shall be known and may be cited as the "Discount Retailer
Workforce Safety and Retention Act".
§272. Legislative findings
The legislature hereby finds and declares that violence against small box
discount retail workforce is a growing problem in this state. This workforce is
experiencing disproportionate levels of unsafe conditions from verbal harassment to
physical violence. Since small box discount retail stores offer essential necessities
to the public, this violence is also a threat to public health and safety. The legislature
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1274 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 585
strongly encourages small box discount retail employers to take necessary
responsibilities in ensuring the health and safety of their employees and this essential
workforce by conducting risk assessments of their workplaces, providing safety
plans for their stores, and implementing safety solutions when necessary.
§273. Definitions
For the purpose of this Part, the following terms have the meanings ascribed
to them:
(1) "Employee" means an individual employed by an employer.
(2)(a) "Employer" means a person, association, legal or commercial entity,
limited liability corporation, holding company, parent company, or corporate group
receiving services from an employee, and, in return, giving compensation of any
kind to an employee.
(b) "Employer" does not include an employer who employs fewer than
fifteen employees within this state for each working day for twenty or more calendar
weeks in the current or preceding calendar year.
(3)(a) "Small box discount store" means a business that has a floor area of
five thousand to ten thousand square feet, which sells retail physical goods, products,
or merchandise directly to the consumer, including food or beverages for
off-premises consumption, household products, personal grooming and health
products, and other consumer goods, with the majority of items being offered for sale
at lower than the typical market price.
(b) Small box discount stores does not include any of the following:
(i) Businesses that dedicate at least fifteen percent of floor area to fresh
foods and vegetables.
(ii) Businesses that contain a prescription pharmacy.
(iii) Businesses that sell gasoline or diesel fuel.
(iv) Businesses that contain a majority of goods that serve the purpose of
home improvement or construction.
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1274 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 585
(4) "Workplace violence" means any of the following acts that occur against,
or in front of, an employee during the employee's work hours or during the scope of
the employee's employment:
(a) The commission of a robbery.
(b) An incident involving the threat or use of a firearm or other dangerous
weapon capable of significant physical harm, regardless of whether the employee
sustains an injury.
(c) Any other violent act, including crimes of violence as defined in R.S.
14:2(B).
§274. Workplace violence; evaluation; plans
A. Each small box discount retail employer shall evaluate the workplace to
determine the presence of factors or situations, if any, in the workplace that might
place employees at risk of workplace violence. Examples of factors or situations
may include but are not limited to:
(1) Working late night or early morning shifts.
(2) Exchanging money with the public.
(3) Working alone or in small numbers.
(4) Uncontrolled access to the workplace.
(5) Instances of violence in the local vicinity of the workplace.
B. Each small box discount retail employer shall develop and implement, or
provide a timeline no longer than six months to implement, a written workforce
safety plan. The workforce safety plan shall include instructions for all of the
following:
(1) Making high-risk areas more visible to more people.
(2) Installing external lighting.
(3) Using drop safes or other methods to minimize cash on hand.
(4) Posting signs stating that limited cash is on hand.
(5) Establishing and implementing reporting systems for incidents of
workplace violence.
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1274 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 585
C.(1) Each small box discount retail employer shall make a written
workplace risk evaluation and workplace violence prevention program available
upon request to employees, their designated representatives, the secretary of
Louisiana Works, and the public.
(2) New hires shall be provided a copy of the written program upon hire.
(3) Employers may provide one evaluation and plan applicable to all
workplaces or work sites.
D. Each small box discount retail employer shall document each incident of
workplace violence and shall maintain a copy of each incident. Each employer shall
review the number and scope of workplace incidents annually and make changes to
the risk factors as necessary and appropriate.
E. If a small box discount retail employer has experienced two or more
violent incidents at an individual workplace location within a year, the small box
discount retailer employer shall do all of the following:
(1) Install panic buttons easily accessible throughout the workplace.
(2) Reassess and increase staffing levels during high-risk times if the violent
incident occurred while the impacted employee was working alone. Increased
staffing may include an employee whose sole purpose is to ensure workforce safety
at the work site.
§275. Retaliation prohibited
A. No small box discount retailer employer shall prohibit an employee from,
or take punitive or retaliatory action against an employee for, seeking assistance and
intervention from local emergency services or law enforcement when a workplace
violence incident occurs.
B. No small box discount retailer employer shall take any retaliatory action
against an employee who, in good faith, reports an allegation of or an instance of
workplace violence.
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1274 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 585
§276. Civil remedy
A. An employee shall have a civil right of action for damages, including
reasonable attorney fees, and may bring an action against an employer within one
year of the violation of the provisions of this Chapter.
B. A civil action may be instituted in the judicial district court in the parish
where the employee is domiciled, the parish where the workplace violence incident
occurred, or the parish of proper venue pursuant to the general rules of venue as set
forth in Code of Civil Procedure Article 42.